Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5247
Premium, defined.

Premium shall mean all money paid by a small employer and eligible employees as a condition of receiving coverage from a small employer carrier, including any fees or other contributions associated with the health benefit plan.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 25.